Hawaii statutes.
PART V.
ASSIGNMENT TO ANOTHER CIRCUIT;

TEMPORARY
ASSIGNMENT OF RETIRED CIRCUIT JUDGES

Note

Part heading amended by L 1972, c 88, pt of §3(r); L 1983, c
244, §2.

§603-41 When judge may be required to
preside in another circuit; temporary assignment of retired circuit judges.
Whenever it is advisable, by reason of the disqualification of any circuit
judge, or the judge's inability to attend to the judge's duties or there is a
vacancy in the office of any circuit judge, or a congestion of work in any circuit
court, or for any other reason, the chief justice of the supreme court may
assign and require the judge of any other circuit, or any retired circuit
judge, from any circuit, to hear and determine any or all matters then or
thereafter pending in the circuit to which the judge is assigned for such
purpose, and to perform any other duties pertaining to the office of circuit
judge of the circuit to which the judge is so assigned, and while so engaged
the judge shall have and exercise all the powers vested in a judge of that
circuit. A judge serving temporarily shall not be actively engaged in the
practice of law. Temporarily assigned retired circuit court judges shall be
compensated per diem at a rate of pay equivalent to that of circuit court
judges. [L 1892, c 57, §45; am L 1901, c 12, §1; am L 1923, c 164, §1; RL 1945,
§9642; am L 1949, c 37, §1; RL 1955, §215-12; HRS §603-41; am L 1972, c 88,
§3(s); am L 1983, c 244, §3; gen ch 1993]

Cross References

See Const. art. VI, §6.

Case Notes

Cited: 22 H. 589, 593 (1915); 26 H. 557 (1922).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next